Utah statutes.
4-31-18.   State chemist -- Assistance in diagnosis of disease.

The state chemist, upon submission by the commissioner, shall examine and analyze all tissue, grass, water, or other substances necessary in the proper diagnosis of disease or losses among livestock.

